Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB306.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 322.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall qualify for licensure as a professional engineer by meeting the requirements set forth in
paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(a) A person shall qualify if he or she has:
1. Graduated from one (1) of the following:
a. An engineering program of four (4) years or more accredited by the Engineering
Accreditation Commission of the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology or
any engineering program deemed equivalent by the board; or
b. A fire protection engineering technology program of four (4) years or more accredited
by the Engineering Technology Accreditation Commission of the Accreditation Board
for Engineering and Technology with at least forty-five (45) college semester credit
hours of engineering topics, including engineering science or engineering design
courses;
2. For an applicant qualifying for licensure pursuant to subparagraph 1.a. of this paragraph,
four (4) or more additional years of progressive experience in engineering or teaching of a grade
and character which indicates to the board that the applicant is competent to practice
engineering;[ and]
3. For an applicant qualifying for licensure pursuant to subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph, the
individual shall obtain six (6) or more additional years of progressive experience in
engineering or teaching of a grade and character that indicates to the board that the applicant
is competent to practice fire protection engineering; and
4. A passing score on:
a. The Principles and Practice of Engineering Examination; and
b. The Fundamentals of Engineering Examination. The board may allow students enrolled in
the final year of an undergraduate engineering program to take this examination. Upon
passing the examination, the applicant shall be designated an engineer in training.
(b) If an instructor in an engineering program accredited by the Engineering Accreditation Commission of
the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology, a fire protection engineering technology
program accredited by the Engineering Technology Accreditation Commission of the Accreditation
Board for Engineering and Technology, or an engineering program deemed equivalent by the board is
not eligible for the exemption under subsection (2) of this section, the instructor shall have four (4)
years from the date of hire to qualify for licensure by showing that he or she has:
1. Graduated from an engineering program of four (4) years or more accredited by the Engineering
Accreditation Commission of the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology, or an
engineering program deemed equivalent by the board;
2. Four (4) or more additional years of progressive experience in engineering or teaching of a grade
and character which indicates to the board that the applicant is competent to practice
engineering;
3. Passed the Principles and Practice of Engineering Examination; and
4. Either passed the Fundamentals of Engineering Examination or graduated from a board-approved
doctoral engineering degree program.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) For the purpose of teaching engineering design courses only, an instructor who, on January 1, 1999, holds a
tenured or tenure-track position in an engineering program defined in KRS 322.010(4)(a)3. shall be exempt
from the licensure requirements of KRS 322.020 for the period that instructor is continuously employed by the
institution offering that program. However, an instructor may apply and shall qualify for licensure as a
professional engineer during this exempt period if he or she:
(a) Has graduated from an engineering program of four (4) years or more accredited by the Engineering
Accreditation Commission of the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology or an
engineering program deemed equivalent by the board;
(b) Has graduated from a board-approved doctoral engineering degree program, with an additional three (3)
years or more of progressive experience in engineering or teaching of a grade and character which
indicate to the board that the applicant is competent to practice engineering; and
(c) Has passed the Principles and Practice of Engineering Examination.
(3) Any person having the necessary qualifications prescribed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be
eligible to apply for licensure, even if the applicant is not practicing the profession at the time of application.
(4) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish requirements for consideration of
experience gained prior to graduation from an engineering program as described in subsection (1)(a)1. of this
section.
(5) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish requirements for consideration of
engineering topics, including engineering science or engineering design courses, as described in subsection
(1)(a)1.b. of this section.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.